Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-502
Court of record; location.

There shall
be a county court in and for each county in this state. The county court shall
be a court of record and shall be located at the county seat.

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 2.